seg/mar.2.dix
    <pardef n="/हो__vblex">
      <e>     <p><l>होण</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>  

      <e>     <p><l>हो</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होऊया</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>होऊयात</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होयला</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होऊ</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>होत</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>होतो</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होते</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होतो</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>होतोस</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होतेस</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होता</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>होतो</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होते</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होते</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होतात</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      
      <e>     <p><l>झालो</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>झाले</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>झालो</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>झालास</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झाला</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>झालीस</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झाली</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>झालात</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झाला</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झाले</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>झाल्यात</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झालात</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झाल्या</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झाला</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>झाला</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>झाली</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>झाले</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झालं</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>झालेत</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झाले</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>झाल्या</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झाल्यात</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>      <p><l>झाली</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>झालीत</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>     <p><l>होईन</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होऊ</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होशील</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होल</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होईल</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>होतील</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>होणार</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होणार</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होणार</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- subjunctive -->
      <e>         <p><l>होवा</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होवी</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होवे</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>होवेत</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होव्या</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>होव्यात</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      
      <e>         <p><l>होवा</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होवी</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होवे</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">  <p><l>होवेत</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होव्या</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e r="LR">   <p><l>होव्यात</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>         <p><l>होवा</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>         <p><l>होवी</l><r>होणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

    <e lm="हो">              <i></i><par n="/हो__vblex" /></e>
